Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-154
Sewers; right-of-way; condemnation; procedure.

In case of the refusal of the owner or owners or claimant or claimants of any lands or any right-of-way, or any easement in any lands through which cities of the second class propose to construct any sewer or drain or any outlet for any sewer or drain, to allow the passage thereof, the city proposing to construct such sewer or drain, and desiring the right-of-way may proceed to acquire same by the exercise of the power of eminent domain. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1905, c. 28, § 1, p. 253;

R.S.1913, § 5049;

C.S.1922, § 4218;

C.S.1929, § 17-157;

R.S.1943, § 17-154;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 55, p. 472.